Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0769.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 64a. (1) The department shall provide each prisoner when
the prisoner is received in a correctional facility a medical
information release form, an emergency contact form, and the
brochure developed under subsection (8). The department shall also
provide each prisoner already in the custody of the department on
the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section a
medical information release form and emergency contact form to be
used as provided in this section. If a prisoner is unable to
complete the medical information release form or emergency contact
LEP S04414'25 (S-1) y5dpri


form independently, on request, the department shall make available
a prisoner counselor, facility Americans with Disabilities Act
coordinator, or health services staff member to assist the prisoner
in completing the form or forms.
(2) A medical information release form and emergency contact
form executed by a prisoner under this section must be signed by
the prisoner.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in a guardianship order, a
prisoner under a guardianship order has the right to complete the
medical information release form and emergency contact form under
this section.
(4) If a prisoner executes a medical information release form
under this section, the prisoner shall provide the full name and
contact information for each individual the prisoner wishes to
designate as an authorized recipient. A prisoner shall provide on
an emergency contact form the full name and contact information for
each individual the prisoner designates as an emergency contact.
(5) The department shall instruct each prisoner that it is the
prisoner's responsibility to ensure that the contact information
for each individual the prisoner includes on the prisoner's medical
information release form and emergency contact form is and remains
accurate. The department shall instruct each prisoner that the
prisoner may request to amend the prisoner's medical information
release form or emergency contact form if the prisoner becomes
aware that the contact information for an individual listed on a
form has changed or for any other reason.
(6) If a prisoner in the custody of the department experiences
a critical medical emergency, not later than 2 hours after the
prisoner experiences the critical medical emergency, the department
LEP S04414'25 (S-1) y5dpri


shall make an attempt to provide notice of the critical medical
emergency to 1 individual designated as an emergency contact on the
prisoner's emergency contact form. In providing the notice under
this subsection, the department may disclose the location at which
the prisoner is receiving medical treatment for the critical
medical emergency only if the department determines the disclosure
is necessary. If the department, in consultation with the
prisoner's treating physician, determines the critical medical
emergency necessitates the prisoner having a visitor in the
hospital, the department may arrange for approved visitors to visit
with the prisoner in the hospital in accordance with the policies
of the department. The department may deny a visit by an approved
visitor under this subsection only if the department determines the
visit may raise a safety concern. Not later than 5 hours after the
determination is made, the department shall provide, in writing,
the denial of the visit by an approved visitor under this
subsection to the prisoner and the emergency contact.
(7) The department shall provide a prisoner's qualified
medical information to the prisoner's authorized recipient if the
authorized recipient contacts the department and requests the
prisoner's qualified medical information from the department.
(8) Not later than 90 days after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this section, the department shall
develop a form to be used as a medical information release form and
a form to be used as an emergency contact form as provided in this
section. The medical information release form and emergency contact
form must be fully accessible, written in plain language, and, if
requested, available in alternative formats, including, but not
limited to, braille. Not later than 60 days after the effective
LEP S04414'25 (S-1) y5dpri


date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department
shall create a brochure that contains the instruction described
under subsection (5) and that explains the designation of an
individual as an authorized recipient compared to the designation
of an individual as an emergency contact. The department shall make
the brochure under this subsection available on its website, to a
prisoner as described under subsection (1), and to a prisoner at
each annual health examination.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Approved visitors" means the department-approved
immediate family members of a prisoner and the department-approved
clergy members of the prisoner's designated religion.
(b) "Authorized recipient" means the individual a prisoner
designates on the prisoner's medical information release form as
having permission to receive the prisoner's qualified medical
information.
(c) "Critical medical emergency" means a medical emergency
experienced by a prisoner that will require the prisoner to receive
inpatient health care at a hospital.
(d) "Emergency contact" means the individual a prisoner
designates on the prisoner's emergency contact form as being the
individual the prisoner elects the department to contact in a
critical medical emergency.
(e) "Guardianship order" means either of the following:
(i) A court order issued under chapter 6 of the mental health
code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1600 to 330.1644.
(ii) The letters of guardianship issued under part 3 of article
V of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL
700.5301 to 700.5319, for a legally incapacitated individual.
LEP S04414'25 (S-1) y5dpri


(f) "Medical information" means information regarding an
individual's medical history, mental or physical condition, or
medical treatment or diagnosis by a health care professional.
Medical information does not include the location in which a
prisoner is receiving medical treatment from a health care
professional.
(g) "Qualified medical information" means the medical
information a prisoner selects to release to an authorized
recipient on the prisoner's medical information release form.
Final Page
LEP S04414'25 (S-1) y5dpri